Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2879
Delegated dispensing permit; revocation or suspension; procedure; appeal.

(1) A petition for the revocation or suspension of a delegated dispensing permit may be filed by the Attorney General or by the county attorney in the county in which the permittee resides or is dispensing pursuant to a delegated dispensing permit. The petition shall be filed with the board and shall be entitled In the Matter of the Revocation (or suspension) of the Permit of (name of permittee) to dispense drugs and devices. It shall state the charges against the permittee with reasonable definiteness. Upon approval of such petition by the board, it shall be forwarded to the department which shall make an order fixing a time and place for hearing thereon, which shall not be less than ten days nor more than thirty days thereafter. Notice of the filing of such petition and of the time and place of hearing shall be served upon the permittee at least ten days before such hearing.

(2) The notice of charges may be served by any sheriff or constable or by any person especially appointed by the department. The order of revocation or suspension of a permit shall be entered on record and the name of such permittee stricken from the roster of permittees, and the permittee shall not engage in the dispensing of drugs and devices after revocation of the permit or during the time for which it is suspended.

(3) Any permittee shall have the right of appeal from an order of the department denying, revoking, suspending, or refusing renewal of a delegated dispensing permit. The appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1994, LB 900, § 16;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 71;

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 54;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,147.46;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 975.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.